apertium-oc-es/apertium-oc-es.oc.metadix
    <pardef n="t/ier__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ieríem</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ieria</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ieríetz</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ieries</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ierien</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ierie</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ieram</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ierè</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ieratz</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ieràs</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ieràn</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ierà</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ient</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ient</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantant"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>enguent</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>enguent</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantant"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>enguérem</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>enguí</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>enguéretz</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>enguís</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>engueres</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>engueren</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>enguec</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iem</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iem</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantem"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>engam</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>engam</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantem"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>enguésquem</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>enguésquem</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantem"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ietz</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ietz</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantem"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>enguetz</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>enguetz</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantem"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>è</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>en</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>en</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__sigues"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>è</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ie</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ie</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__sigues"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>enguen</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>enguen</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantant"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>engue</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>engue</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cante"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ier</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ier</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ié</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__ac"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ié</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iégem</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ieja</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iégetz</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ieges</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iegen</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iege</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>enguíem</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>enguia</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>enguíetz</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>enguies</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>enguien</l> 
        <r>ier<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>enguie</l> 

    <e lm="abstier">
        <i>abst</i> 
        <par n="t/ier__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="apertier">
        <i>apert</i> 
        <par n="t/ier__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="atier">
        <i>at</i> 
        <par n="t/ier__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="contier">
        <i>cont</i> 
        <par n="t/ier__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="detier">
        <i>det</i> 
        <par n="t/ier__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="entretier" a="carmentano">
        <i>entret</i> 
        <par n="t/ier__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mantier">
        <i>mant</i> 
        <par n="t/ier__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="obtier">
        <i>obt</i> 
        <par n="t/ier__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sostier">
        <i>sost</i> 
        <par n="t/ier__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tier">
        <i>t</i> 
        <par n="t/ier__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tier">
        <i>t</i> 
        <par n="t/ier__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>en<b/>compde</l> 
        <r><g><b/>en<b/>compde</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
